New Jersey, session 221, A107.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 28 of P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.30) is amended to read as follows: 28.  1.  No organization or commercial enterprise, other than a casino located in Atlantic City or its Internet gaming affiliate that has been issued a permit to conduct Internet gaming and has located all of its equipment used to conduct Internet gaming, including computers, servers, monitoring rooms, and hubs, in Atlantic City, shall make its premises available for placing wagers at casinos using the Internet or advertise that its premises may be used for such purpose.  An organization or commercial enterprise that is determined by the division to have violated the provisions of this section shall be subject to a penalty of $1,000 per player per day for making its premises available for placing wagers at casinos using the Internet and of $10,000 per violation for advertising that its premises may be used for such purpose. This section shall not prohibit a casino in Atlantic City, or such a casinos Internet gaming affiliate, from entering into an agreement with a running or harness horse racetrack in this State, under which the racetracks premises may be made available for placing wagers at casinos using the Internet, as permitted by section 2 of P.L.     , c.     (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and shall not prohibit advertising that a racetracks premises may be used for such purpose. (cf: P.L.2013, c.27, s.28) 2.    (New section)  A running or harness horse racetrack in this State may enter into an agreement with a casino located in Atlantic City, or such a casinos Internet gaming affiliate, that allows the racetracks premises to be available as a venue at which the holder of an Internet gaming account may place wagers at casinos using the Internet.  Any such agreement shall be submitted to the Division of Gaming Enforcement for the divisions approval, which shall not be unreasonably withheld.  The division shall have jurisdiction over Internet gaming at casinos that originates from racetracks and shall establish minimum standards for the equipment used and locations at a racetrack from which wagers may be placed. Internet gaming from racetracks shall not be subject to regulation by the New Jersey Racing Commission.  A casino, or its Internet gaming affiliate, shall compensate a racetrack licensee for its services as provided in the terms of the agreement.  The provisions of P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.17) et al. shall apply to the placing of wagers at casinos from racetracks except where inconsistent with the provisions of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.